Utah statutes.
6-1-16.   Sales -- Confirmation.
The assignee may dispose of and sell all the estate assigned, real and
personal, which the debtor had at the time of the assignment, may sue for and
recover in his own name everything belonging or appertaining to said estate,
and generally do whatever the debtor might have done in the premises; but no
sale of real estate belonging to said trust shall be made without notice
published as in case of sales of real estate on execution, unless the court or
judge shall otherwise order, and no such sales shall be valid until approved
by the court or judge.
